Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1177
Uniform traveling expense account form; prescribed.

The Director of Administrative Services is required to have prepared a uniform traveling expense account form to be used by all state officers and employees when making a request for payment or reimbursement for traveling expenses. No traveling expense request shall be approved for payment unless it is made on the form prescribed and furnished by the director.

Laws 1941, c. 180, § 10, p. 706;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 84-306;

R.S.1943, § 84-306;

Laws 1945, c. 253, § 1, p. 790;

Laws 1949, c. 286, § 2, p. 985;

Laws 1949, c. 243, § 4(6), p. 662;

Laws 1972, LB 1440, § 2;

R.S.1943, (1981), § 84-306.05;

Laws 1988, LB 864, § 63.